Hawaii, session 2026, SB564.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  There is established an infrastructure working group within the department of transportation for administrative purposes.  The working group shall conduct a comprehensive study to assess the State's port and harbor system and the potential viability of each location in that system to support current and future agricultural product transportation methods and needs. (b) The working group shall consist of the following individuals: (1)  The deputy director of the harbors division of the department of transportation, or the deputy director's designee, who shall also serve as chair of the working group; (2)  The director of transportation, or the director's designee; (3)  The chairperson of the board of agriculture, or the chairperson's designee; (4)  The administrator of the agricultural development division of the department of agriculture, or the administrator's designee; (5)  The executive director of the agribusiness development corporation, or the executive director's designee; (6)  The director of business, economic development, and tourism, or the director's designee; (7)  One engineer, with relevant experience and requisite expertise, who shall be invited by the chair to participate; (8)  One civil planner, with relevant experience and requisite expertise, who shall be invited by the chair to participate; (9)  An agricultural representative with relevant experience and requisite expertise, who shall be invited by the chair to participate; and (10)  A maritime industry representative familiar with transporting agricultural products with relevant experience and requisite expertise, who shall be invited by the chair to participate. (c) The study shall be a comprehensive assessment of Hawaii's shipping port infrastructure and shall include both qualitative and quantitative data.  Specifically, the study shall include the following topics and components: (1)  Agricultural transportation infrastructure, including assessments of the: (A)  Viability of each pier in the State's port and harbor system to accommodate chillers; shade structures; potable water facilities; centralized facilities for consolidation, deconsolidation, and inspection of agricultural products; and other infrastructure development important to the agriculture sector; (B)  Surrounding area of each pier in the State's port and harbor system that is unable to accommodate protective infrastructure, to determine where protective infrastructure for agriculture products may be accessed or constructed nearby; (C)  Availability of chiller trucks and container trailers in the State; (D)  Maximum size of chiller containers and number of freight vehicles that each pier in the State's port and harbor system is able to accommodate; (E)  Maximum number of livestock that each pier in the State's port and harbor system is able to accommodate in shaded areas; and (F)  Surrounding area of each pier in the State's port and harbor system where inspection, quarantining, and destructing of infested products and goods moving between islands can be conducted; (2)  Port facilities and layout, including: (A)  Detailed maps and layout of each shipping port in the State; (B)  Identification of berths, terminals, and other facilities at each shipping port in the State; and (C)  Information on the capacity and handling capabilities of each facility identified in subparagraph (B); (3)  Infrastructure condition, including: (A)  Assessment of the current condition of docks, piers, and other physical structures at each shipping port in the State; (B)  Evaluation of the condition of road and rail access to each shipping port in the State; and (C)  Inspection of equipment, including cranes, conveyors, and handling machinery, at each shipping port in the State; (4)  Evaluation of the efficiency and reliability of intermodal transportation networks, including rail, roads, and air, connecting shipping in the State; (5)  Technology and automation, including: (A)  Identification of the level of technological integration and automation in handling and processing at each shipping port in the State; (B)  Information on the use of modern technologies for cargo tracking, security, and efficiency at each shipping port in the State; and (C)  Assessment of the readiness for implementation of future technological advancements at each shipping port in the State; (6)  Safety and security, including: (A)  Evaluation of current safety measures for workers and protocols to safeguard products arriving at each shipping port in the State; (B)  Infrastructure and measures for security at each shipping port in the State, including surveillance systems; and (C)  Evaluation of emergency response capabilities and plans at each shipping port in the State; (7)  Environmental impact, including: (A)  Assessment of the environmental impact of operations at each shipping port in the State; (B)  Evaluation of compliance with federal and state environmental regulations and sustainability practices at each shipping port in the State; and (C)  Evaluation of the efficacy of measures in place to control and prevent pollution at each shipping port in the State; (8)  Capacity and utilization, including: (A)  Analysis of current cargo throughput and port capacity at each shipping port in the State; (B)  Projections for future growth and potential capacity constraints for imports and inter-island trade at each shipping port in the State; and (C)  Assessment of peak demand periods, and handling capabilities during peak demand periods, at each shipping port in the State; (9)  Regulatory compliance, including: (A)  Evaluation of compliance with federal, state, and county regulations at each shipping port in the State; and (B)  Analysis of permitting processes and any challenges related to regulatory compliance at each shipping port in the State; (10)  Economic impact, including: (A)  Assessment of the economic contribution of each shipping port in the State to the economy of the State and the applicable county; and (B)  Assessment of job creation and economic development associated with port activities at each shipping port in the State; (11)  Stakeholder engagement, including: (A)  Input from key stakeholders, including port authorities, shipping companies, labor unions, and surrounding residential communities of each shipping port in the State; and (B)  Compilation and analysis of public opinion and concerns related to port operations; (12)  Infrastructure maintenance and upkeep, including: (A)  Evaluation of the routine maintenance practices and procedures relating to infrastructure at each shipping port in the State; and (B)  Identification and assessment of plans for infrastructure upgrades and improvements at each shipping port in the State; (13)  Climate resilience, including: (A)  Evaluation of the vulnerability of port infrastructure at each shipping port in the State to climate change; and (B)  Identification of proposed strategies and plans for enhancing climate change resilience and adaptation efforts in the State's port and harbor system; (14)  Financial viability, including: (A)  Assessment of the financial health of operations at each shipping port in the State; and (B)  Funding sources for maintenance of, upgrades to, and expansion of each shipping port in the State; (15)  Analysis of global trade patterns, the potential impact on activity at each shipping port in the State, and each shipping port's preparedness for projected shifts in trade patterns; (16)  Assessment of the plans and protocols in the State's port and harbor system for responding to emergencies such as natural disasters or security threats, including coordination with county emergency services during an emergency; and (17)  Data and information systems, including: (A)  Assessment of the availability and reliability of data for monitoring and decision-making in the State's port and harbor system; and (B)  Assessment of information systems supporting logistics and operations at each shipping port in the State. (d) The working group may request information, and shall receive cooperation, from each executive department and government agency in the State and each county, as necessary, including the department of the attorney general; department of business, economic development, and tourism; department of commerce and consumer protection; department of defense; economic research organization at the university of Hawaii; State climate commission; office of planning and sustainable development; and the planning departments of each county. (e) The working group shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature by November 1, 2027. (f) The department of transportation and the department of agriculture shall provide to the working group any necessary administrative support, including the preparation of the report required by subsection (e). SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purposes of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________